Massachusetts, session 194th, H302.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 8 of chapter 40R of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting, after line 14, the following paragraph:-
Upon the approval of a comprehensive housing production plan by the department, a city
or town shall have the right to deny any housing application that is inconsistent with the goals of
said housing production plan for a period of not more than two years following the plan’s initial
approval.
of 1